North Carolina statutes. Chapter 160A. Cities and Towns.
Article 22. Urban Redevelopment Law.

§ 160A-500.
Short title.

This Article shall be known and may be cited as the “Urban Redevelopment Law.”

History.

1951, c. 1095, s. 1; 1973, c. 426, s. 75.

Local Modification.

(As to Article 22) Town of Carrboro: 1987, c. 476, s. 1; (As to Article 22) Troy Redevelopment Commission: 2002-83, s. 1.

§ 160A-501.
Findings and declaration of policy.

It is hereby determined and declared as a matter of legislative finding:

That there exist in urban communities in this State blighted areas as defined herein.

That such areas are economic or social liabilities, inimical and injurious to the public health, safety, morals and welfare of the residents of the State, harmful to the social and economic well-being of the entire communities in which they exist, depreciating values therein, reducing tax revenues, and thereby depreciating further the general community-wide values.

That the existence of such areas contributes substantially and increasingly to the spread of disease and crime, necessitating excessive and disproportionate expenditures of public funds for the preservation of the public health and safety, for crime prevention, correction, prosecution, punishment and the treatment of juvenile delinquency and for the maintenance of adequate police, fire and accident protection and other public services and facilities, constitutes an economic and social liability, substantially impairs or arrests the sound growth of communities.

That the foregoing conditions are beyond remedy or control entirely by regulatory processes in the exercise of the police power and cannot be effectively dealt with by private enterprise under existing law without the additional aids herein granted.

That the acquisition, preparation, sale, sound replanning, and redevelopment of such areas in accordance with sound and approved plans for their redevelopment will promote the public health, safety, convenience and welfare.

Therefore, it is hereby declared to be the policy of the State of North Carolina to promote the health, safety, and welfare of the inhabitants thereof by the creation of bodies corporate and politic to be known as redevelopment commissions, which shall exist and operate for the public purposes of acquiring and replanning such areas and of holding or disposing of them in such manner that they shall become available for economically and socially sound redevelopment. Such purposes are hereby declared to be public uses for which public money may be spent, and private property may be acquired by the exercise of the power of eminent domain.

History.

1951, c. 1095, s. 2; 1973, c. 426, s. 75.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “ ‘Don’t Know What a Slide Rule Is For’: The Need for a Precise Definition of Public Purpose in North Carolina in the Wake of Kelo v. City of New London,” see
28 Campbell L. Rev. 291 (2006).

§ 160A-502.
Additional findings and declaration of policy.

It is further determined and declared as a matter of legislative finding:

That the cities of North Carolina constitute important assets for the State and its citizens; that the preservation of the cities and of urban life against physical, social, and other hazards is vital to the safety, health, and welfare of the citizens of the State, and sound urban development in the future is essential to the continued economic development of North Carolina, and that the creation, existence, and growth of substandard areas present substantial hazards to the cities of the State, to urban life, and to sound future urban development.

That blight exists in commercial and industrial areas as well as in residential areas, in the form of dilapidated, deteriorated, poorly ventilated, obsolete, overcrowded, unsanitary, or unsafe buildings, inadequate and unsafe streets, inadequate lots, and other conditions detrimental to the sound growth of the community; that the presence of such conditions tends to depress the value of neighboring properties, to impair the tax base of the community, and to inhibit private efforts to rehabilitate or improve other structures in the area; and that the acquisition, preparation, sale, sound replanning and redevelopment of such areas in accordance with sound and approved plans will promote the public health, safety, convenience and welfare.

That not only is it in the interest of the public health, safety, convenience and welfare to eliminate existing substandard areas of all types, but it is also in the public interest and less costly to the community to prevent the creation of new blighted areas or the expansion of existing blighted areas; that vigorous enforcement of municipal and State building standards, sound planning of new community facilities, public acquisition of dilapidated, obsolescent buildings, and other municipal action can aid in preventing the creation of new blighted areas or the expansion of existing blighted areas; and that rehabilitation, conservation, and reconditioning of areas in accordance with sound and approved plans, where, in the absence of such action, there is a clear and present danger that the area will become blighted, will protect and promote the public health, safety, convenience and welfare.

Therefore it is hereby declared to be the policy of the State of North Carolina to protect and promote the health, safety, and welfare of the inhabitants of its urban areas by authorizing redevelopment commissions to undertake nonresidential redevelopment in accord with sound and approved plans and to undertake the rehabilitation, conservation, and reconditioning of areas where, in the absence of such action, there is a clear and present danger that the area will become blighted.

History.

1961, c. 837, s. 1; 1973, c. 426, s. 75.

§ 160A-503.
Definitions.

The following terms where used in this Article, shall have the following meanings, except where the context clearly indicates a different meaning:

“Area of operation” — The area within the territorial boundaries of the city or county for which a particular commission is created.

“Blighted area” shall mean an area in which there is a predominance of buildings or improvements (or which is predominantly residential in character), and which, by reason of dilapidation, deterioration, age or obsolescence, inadequate provision for ventilation, light, air, sanitation, or open spaces, high density of population and overcrowding, unsanitary or unsafe conditions, or the existence of conditions which endanger life or property by fire and other causes, or any combination of such factors, substantially impairs the sound growth of the community, is conducive to ill health, transmission of disease, infant mortality, juvenile delinquency and crime, and is detrimental to the public health, safety, morals or welfare; provided, no area shall be considered a blighted area within the meaning of this Article, unless it is determined by the planning commission that at least two thirds of the number of buildings within the area are of the character described in this subdivision and substantially contribute to the conditions making such area a blighted area; provided that if the power of eminent domain shall be exercised under the provisions of this Article, it may only be exercised to take a blighted parcel as defined in subdivision (2a) of this section, and the property owner or owners or persons having an interest in property shall be entitled to be represented by counsel of their own selection and their reasonable counsel fees fixed by the court, taxed as a part of the costs and paid by the petitioners.

(2a)

“Blighted parcel” shall mean a parcel on which there is a predominance of buildings or improvements (or which is predominantly residential in character), and which, by reason of dilapidation, deterioration, age or obsolescence, inadequate provision for ventilation, light, air, sanitation, or open spaces, high density of population and overcrowding, unsanitary or unsafe conditions, or the existence of conditions which endanger life or property by fire and other causes, or any combination of such factors, substantially impairs the sound growth of the community, is conducive to ill health, transmission of disease, infant mortality, juvenile delinquency and crime, and is detrimental to the public health, safety, morals or welfare; provided, no parcel shall be considered a blighted parcel nor subject to the power of eminent domain, within the meaning of this Article, unless it is determined by the planning commission that the parcel is blighted.

“Bonds” — Any bonds, interim certificates, notes, debentures or other obligations of a commission issued pursuant to this Article.

“City” — Any city or town. “The city” shall mean the particular city for which a particular commission is created.

“Commission” or “redevelopment commission” — A public body and a body corporate and politic created and organized in accordance with the provisions of this Article.

“Field of operation” — The area within the territorial boundaries of the city for which a particular commission is created.

“Governing body” — In the case of a city or town, the city council or other legislative body. The board of county commissioners.

“Government” — Includes the State and federal governments or any subdivision, agency or instrumentality corporate or otherwise of either of them.

“Municipality” — Any incorporated city or town, or any county.

“Nonresidential redevelopment area” shall mean an area in which there is a predominance of buildings or improvements, whose use is predominantly nonresidential, and which, by reason of:

Dilapidation, deterioration, age or obsolescence of buildings and other structures,

Inadequate provisions for ventilation, light, air, sanitation or open spaces,

Defective or inadequate street layout,

Faulty lot layout in relation to size, adequacy, accessibility, or usefulness,

Tax or special assessment delinquency exceeding the fair value of the property,

Unsanitary or unsafe conditions,

The existence of conditions which endanger life or property by fire and other causes, or

Any combination of such factors

Substantially impairs the sound growth of the community,

Has seriously adverse effects on surrounding development, and

Is detrimental to the public health, safety, morals or welfare;

provided, no such area shall be considered a nonresidential redevelopment area nor subject to the power of eminent domain, within the meaning of this Article, unless it is determined by the planning commission that at least one half of the number of buildings within the area are of the character described in this subdivision and substantially contribute to the conditions making such area a nonresidential redevelopment area; provided that if the power of eminent domain shall be exercised under the provisions of this Article, the property owner or owners or persons having an interest in property shall be entitled to be represented by counsel of their own selection and their reasonable counsel fees fixed by the court, taxed as a part of the costs and paid by the petitioners.

“Obligee of the commission” or “obligee” — Any bondholder, trustee or trustees for any bondholders, any lessor demising property to a commission used in connection with a redevelopment project, or any assignees of such lessor’s interest, or any part thereof, and the federal government, when it is a party to any contract with a commission.

“Planning commission” — Any planning commission established by ordinance for a municipality of this State. “The planning commission” shall mean the particular planning commission of the city or town in which a particular commission operates.

“Real property” — Lands, lands under water, structures and any and all easements, franchises and incorporeal hereditaments and every estate and right therein, legal and equitable, including terms for years and liens by way of judgment, mortgage or otherwise.

“Redeveloper” — Any individual, partnership or public or private corporation that shall enter or propose to enter into a contract with a commission for the redevelopment of an area under the provisions of this Article.

“Redevelopment” — The acquisition, replanning, clearance, rehabilitation or rebuilding of an area for residential, recreational, commercial, industrial or other purposes, including the provision of streets, utilities, parks, recreational areas and other open spaces; provided, without limiting the generality thereof, the term “redevelopment” may include a program of repair and rehabilitation of buildings and other improvements, and may include the exercise of any powers under this Article with respect to the area for which such program is undertaken.

“Redevelopment area” — Any area which a planning commission may find to be

A blighted area because of the conditions enumerated in subdivision (2) of this section;

A nonresidential redevelopment area because of conditions enumerated in subdivision (10) of this section;

A rehabilitation, conservation, and reconditioning area within the meaning of subdivision (21) of this section;

Any combination thereof, so as to require redevelopment under the provisions of this Article.

“Redevelopment contract” — A contract between a commission and a redeveloper for the redevelopment of an area under the provisions of this Article.

“Redevelopment plan” — A plan for the redevelopment of a redevelopment area made by a “commission” in accordance with the provisions of this Article.

“Redevelopment project” shall mean any work or undertaking:

To acquire blighted or nonresidential redevelopment areas or portions thereof, or individual tracts in rehabilitation, conservation, and reconditioning areas, including lands, structures, or improvements, the acquisition of which is necessary or incidental to the proper clearance, development, or redevelopment of such areas or to the prevention of the spread or recurrence of conditions of blight;

To clear any such areas by demolition or removal of existing buildings, structures, streets, utilities or other improvements thereon and to install, construct, or reconstruct streets, utilities, and site improvements essential to the preparation of sites for uses in accordance with the redevelopment plan;

To sell land in such areas for residential, recreational, commercial, industrial or other use or for the public use to the highest bidder as herein set out or to retain such land for public use, in accordance with the redevelopment plan;

To carry out plans for a program of voluntary or compulsory repair, rehabilitation, or reconditioning of buildings or other improvements in such areas; including the making of loans therefor; and

To engage in programs of assistance and financing, including the making of loans, for rehabilitation, repair, construction, acquisition, or reconditioning of residential units and commercial and industrial facilities in a redevelopment area.The term “redevelopment project” may also include the preparation of a redevelopment plan, the planning, survey and other work incident to a redevelopment project, and the preparation of all plans and arrangements for carrying out a redevelopment project.

“Redevelopment proposal” — A proposal, including supporting data and the form of a redevelopment contract for the redevelopment of all or any part of a redevelopment area.

“Rehabilitation, conservation, and reconditioning area” shall mean any area which the planning commission shall find, by reason of factors listed in subdivision (2) or subdivision (10), to be subject to a clear and present danger that, in the absence of municipal action to rehabilitate, conserve, and recondition the area, it will become in the reasonably foreseeable future a blighted area or a nonresidential redevelopment area as defined herein. In such an area, no individual tract, building, or improvement shall be subject to the power of eminent domain, within the meaning of this Article, unless it is of the character described in subdivision (2) or subdivision (10) and substantially contributes to the conditions endangering the area; provided that if the power of eminent domain shall be exercised under the provisions of this Article, the respondent or respondents shall be entitled to be represented by counsel of their own selection and their reasonable counsel fees fixed by the court, taxed as part of the costs and paid by the petitioners.

History.

1951, c. 1095, s. 3; 1957, c. 502, ss. 1-3; 1961, c. 837, ss. 2, 3, 4, 6; 1967, c. 1249; 1969, c. 1208, s. 1; 1973, c. 426, s. 75; 1981, c. 907, ss. 1, 2; 1985, c. 665, s. 6; 2006-224, ss. 2.1, 2.2; 2006-259, s. 47.

§ 160A-504.
Formation of commissions.

Each municipality, as defined herein, is hereby authorized to create separate and distinct bodies corporate and politic to be known as the redevelopment commission of the municipality by the passage by the governing body of such municipality of an ordinance or resolution creating a commission to function within the territorial limits of said municipality. Notice of the intent to consider the passage of such a resolution or ordinance shall be published at least 10 days prior to the meeting.

The governing body of a municipality shall not adopt a resolution pursuant to subsection (a) above unless it finds:

That blighted areas (as herein defined) exist in such municipality, and

That the redevelopment of such areas is necessary in the interest of the public health, safety, morals or welfare of the residents of such municipality.

The governing body shall cause a certified copy of such ordinance or resolution to be filed in the office of the Secretary of State; upon receipt of the said certificate the Secretary of State shall issue a certificate of incorporation.

In any suit, action or proceeding involving or relating to the validity or enforcement of any contract or act of a commission, a copy of the certificate of incorporation duly certified by the Secretary of State shall be admissible in evidence and shall be conclusive proof of the legal establishment of the commission.

History.

1951, c. 1095, s. 4; 1973, c. 426, s. 75.

§ 160A-505.
Alternative organization.

In lieu of creating a redevelopment commission as authorized herein, the governing body of any municipality may, if it deems wise, either designate a housing authority created under the provisions of Chapter 157 of the General Statutes to exercise the powers, duties, and responsibilities of a redevelopment commission as prescribed herein, or undertake to exercise such powers, duties, and responsibilities itself. Any such designation shall be by passage of a resolution adopted in accordance with the procedure and pursuant to the findings specified in

G.S. 160A-504(a)

and (b). In the event a governing body designates itself to perform the powers, duties, and responsibilities of a redevelopment commission under this subsection, or exercises those powers, duties, and responsibilities pursuant to G.S. 153A-376 or G.S. 160A-456, then where any act or proceeding is required to be done, recommended, or approved both by a redevelopment commission and by the municipal governing body, then the performance, recommendation, or approval thereof once by the municipal governing body shall be sufficient to make such performance, recommendation, or approval valid and legal. In the event a municipal governing body designates itself to exercise the powers, duties, and responsibilities of a redevelopment commission, it may assign the administration of redevelopment policies, programs and plans to any existing or new department of the municipality.

The governing body of any municipality which has prior to July 1, 1969, created, or which may hereafter create, a redevelopment commission may, in its discretion, by resolution abolish such redevelopment commission, such abolition to be effective on a day set in such resolution not less than 90 days after its adoption. Upon the adoption of such a resolution, the redevelopment commission of the municipality is hereby authorized and directed to take such actions and to execute such documents as will carry into effect the provisions and the intent of the resolution, and as will effectively transfer its authority, responsibilities, obligations, personnel, and property, both real and personal, to the municipality. Any municipality which abolishes a redevelopment commission pursuant to this subsection may, at any time subsequent to such abolition or concurrently therewith, exercise the authority granted by subsection (a) of this section.On the day set in the resolution of the governing body:

The redevelopment commission shall cease to exist as a body politic and corporate and as a public body;

All property, real and personal and mixed, belonging to the redevelopment commission shall vest in, belong to, and be the property of the municipality;

All judgments, liens, rights of liens, and causes of action of any nature in favor of the redevelopment commission shall remain, vest in, and inure to the benefit of the municipality;

All rentals, taxes, assessments, and any other funds, charges or fees, owing to the redevelopment commission shall be owed to and collected by the municipality;

Any actions, suits, and proceedings pending against, or having been instituted by the redevelopment commission shall not be abated by such abolition, but all such actions, suits, and proceedings shall be continued and completed in the same manner as if abolition had not occurred, and the municipality shall be a party to all such actions, suits, and proceedings in the place and stead of the redevelopment commission and shall pay or cause to be paid any judgment rendered against the redevelopment commission in any such actions, suits, or proceedings, and no new process need be served in any such action, suit, or proceeding;

All obligations of the redevelopment commission, including outstanding indebtedness, shall be assumed by the municipality, and all such obligations and outstanding indebtedness shall be constituted obligations and indebtedness of the municipality;

All ordinances, rules, regulations and policies of the redevelopment commission shall continue in full force and effect until repealed or amended by the governing body of the municipality.

Where the governing body of any municipality has in its discretion, by resolution, abolished a redevelopment commission pursuant to subsection (b) above, the governing body of such municipality may, at any time subsequent to the passage of a resolution abolishing a redevelopment commission, or concurrently therewith, by the passage of a resolution adopted in accordance with the procedures and pursuant to the findings specified in

G.S. 160A-504(a)

and (b), designate an existing housing authority created pursuant to Chapter 157 of the General Statutes to exercise the powers, duties, and responsibilities of a redevelopment commission. Where the governing body of any municipality designates, pursuant to this subsection, an existing housing authority created pursuant to Chapter 157 of the General Statutes to exercise the powers, duties, and responsibilities of a redevelopment commission, on the day set in the resolution of the governing body passed pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, or pursuant to subsection (c) of this section:

The redevelopment commission shall cease to exist as a body politic and corporate and as a public body;

All property, real and personal and mixed, belonging to the redevelopment commission or to the municipality as hereinabove provided in subsections (a) or (b), shall vest in, belong to, and be the property of the existing housing authority of the municipality;

All judgments, liens, rights of liens, and causes of action of any nature in favor of the redevelopment commission or in favor of the municipality as hereinabove provided in subsections (a) or (b), shall remain, vest in, and inure to the benefit of the existing housing authority of the municipality;

All rentals, taxes, assessments, and any other funds, charges or fees owing to the redevelopment commission, or owing to the municipality as hereinabove provided in subsections (a) or (b), shall be owed to and collected by the existing housing authority of the municipality;

Any actions, suits, and proceedings pending against or having been instituted by the redevelopment commission, or the municipality, or to which the municipality has become a party, as hereinabove provided in subsections (a) or (b), shall not be abated by such abolition but all such actions, suits, and proceedings shall be continued and completed in the same manner as if abolition had not occurred, and the existing housing authority of the municipality shall be a party to all such actions, suits, and proceedings in the place and stead of the redevelopment commission, or the municipality, and shall pay or cause to be paid any judgments rendered in such actions, suits, or proceedings, and no new processes need be served in such action, suit, or proceeding;

All obligations of the redevelopment commission, or the municipality as hereinabove provided in subsections (a) or (b), including outstanding indebtedness, shall be assumed by the existing housing authority of the municipality; and all such obligations and outstanding indebtedness shall be constituted obligations and indebtedness of the existing housing authority of the municipality.

All ordinances, rules, regulations, and policies of the redevelopment commission, or of the municipality as hereinabove provided in subsections (a) or (b), shall continue in full force and effect until repealed and amended by the existing housing authority of the municipality.

A housing authority designated by the governing body of any municipality to exercise the powers, duties and responsibilities of a redevelopment commission shall, when exercising the same, do so in accordance with Article 22 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes. Otherwise the housing authority shall continue to exercise the powers, duties and responsibilities of a housing authority in accordance with Chapter 157 of the General Statutes.

History.

1969, c. 1217, s. 1; 1971, c. 116, ss. 1, 2; 1973, c. 426, s. 75; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1276, s. 13; 2003-403, s. 16.

§ 160A-505.1.
Commission budgeting and accounting systems as a part of municipality budgeting and accounting systems.

The governing body of a municipality may by resolution provide that the budgeting and accounting systems of the municipality’s redevelopment commission or, if the municipality’s housing authority is exercising the powers, duties, and responsibilities of a redevelopment commission, the budgeting and accounting systems of the housing authority, shall be an integral part of the budgeting and accounting systems of the municipality. If such a resolution is adopted:

For purposes of the Local Government Budget and Fiscal Control Act, the commission or authority shall not be considered a “public authority,” as that phrase is defined in G.S. 159-7(b), but rather shall be considered a department or agency of the municipality. The operations of the commission or authority shall be budgeted and accounted for as if the operations were those of a public enterprise of the municipality.

The budget of the commission or authority shall be prepared and submitted in the same manner and according to the same procedures as are the budgets of other departments and agencies of the municipality; and the budget ordinance of the municipality shall provide for the operations of the commission or authority.

The budget officer and finance officer of the municipality shall administer and control that portion of the municipality’s budget ordinance relating to the operations of the commission or authority.

History.

1971, c. 780, s. 37.2; 1973, c. 474, s. 30.

§ 160A-506.
Creation of a county redevelopment commission.

If the board of county commissioners of a county by resolution declares that blighted areas do exist in said county, and the redevelopment of such areas is necessary in the interest of public health, safety, morals, or welfare of the residents of such county, the county commissioners of said county are hereby authorized to create a separate and distinct body corporate and politic to be known as the redevelopment commission of said county by passing a resolution to create such a commission to function in the territorial limits of said county. Provided, however, that notice of the intent to consider passage of such a resolution or ordinance shall be published at least 10 days prior to the meeting of the board of county commissioners for such purposes, and further provided that the redevelopment commission shall not function in an area where such a commission exists or in the corporate limits of a municipality without resolution of agreement by said municipality.

All of the provisions of Article 22, Chapter 160A of the General Statutes, shall be applicable to county redevelopment commissions, including the formation, appointment, tenure, compensation, organization, interest and powers as specified therein.

History.

1969, c. 1208, s. 2; 1973, c. 426, s. 75.

§ 160A-507.
Creation of a regional redevelopment commission.

If the board of county commissioners of two or more contiguous counties by resolution declare that blighted areas do exist in said counties and the redevelopment of such areas is necessary in the interest of public health, morals, or welfare of the residents of such counties, the county commissioners of said counties are hereby authorized to create a separate and distinct body corporate and politic to be known as the regional redevelopment commission by the passage of a resolution by each county to create such a commission to function in the territorial limits of the counties; provided, however, that notice of the intent to consider passage of such a resolution or ordinance shall be published at least 10 days prior to the meeting of the board of county commissioners for such purposes, and further provided that the redevelopment commission shall not function in an area where such a commission exists or in the corporate limits of a municipality without resolution of agreement by the municipality.

The board of county commissioners of each county included in the regional redevelopment commission shall appoint one person as a commissioner and such a person may be appointed at or after the time of the adoption of the resolution creating the redevelopment commission. The board of county commissioners shall have the authority to appoint successors or to remove persons for misconduct who are appointed by them. Each commissioner to the redevelopment commission shall serve for a five-year term except that initial appointments may be for less time in order to establish a fair donation system of appointments. In the event that a regional redevelopment commission shall have an even number of counties, the Governor of North Carolina shall appoint a member to the commission from the area to be served. The appointed members as commissioners shall constitute the regional redevelopment commission and certification of appointment shall be filed with the Secretary of State as part of the application for charter.

All provisions of the “Urban Redevelopment Law” as defined in Article 22 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes, shall apply to the creation and operation of a regional redevelopment commission, and where reference is made to municipality, it shall be interpreted to apply to the area served by the regional redevelopment commission.

History.

1969, c. 1208, s. 3; 1973, c. 426, s. 75.

§ 160A-507.1.
Creation of a joint county-city redevelopment commission.

A county and one or more cities within the county are hereby authorized to create a separate and distinct body corporate and politic to be known as the joint redevelopment commission by the passage of a resolution by the board of county commissioners and the governing body of one or more cities within the county creating such a commission to function within the territorial limits of such participating units of government; provided, however, that notice of the intent to consider passage of such a resolution or ordinance shall be published at least 10 days prior to the meeting of the affected governing boards for such purposes, and further provided that a joint redevelopment commission created hereunder shall have authority to operate in an area where there presently exists a redevelopment commission upon the approval of the municipality or county concerned. The governing body of each participating local government shall appoint one or more commissioners as such governing bodies shall determine; such persons may be appointed at or after the time of adoption of the resolution creating the joint redevelopment commission. The appointing authority shall have the authority to appoint successors or to remove persons for misfeasance, malfeasance or nonfeasance who are appointed by them. Each commissioner shall serve for a term designated by the governing bodies of not less than one nor more than five years. The appointed members as commissioners shall constitute the joint redevelopment commission and certification of appointment shall be filed with the Secretary of State as part of the application for charter.

All provisions of the “Urban Redevelopment Law” as defined in Article 22 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes shall apply to the creation and operation of a joint redevelopment commission and where reference is made to municipality, it shall be interpreted to apply to the units of government creating a joint redevelopment commission.

History.

1975, c. 407.

§ 160A-508.
Appointment and qualifications of members of commission.

Upon certification of a resolution declaring the need for a commission to operate in a city or town, the mayor and governing board thereof, respectively, shall appoint, as members of the commission, not less than five nor more than nine citizens who shall be residents of the city or town in which the commission is to operate. The governing body may at any time by resolution or ordinance increase or decrease the membership of a commission, within the limitations herein prescribed.

History.

1951, c. 1095, s. 5; 1971, c. 362, ss. 6, 7; 1973, c. 426, s. 75.

Local Modification.

City of Sanford: 1973, c. 990.

§ 160A-509.
Tenure and compensation of members of commission.

The mayor and governing body shall designate overlapping terms of not less than one nor more than five years for the members who are first appointed. Thereafter, the term of office shall be five years. A member shall hold office until his successor has been appointed and qualified. Vacancies for the unexpired terms shall be promptly filled by the mayor and governing body. A member shall receive such compensation, if any, as the municipal governing board may provide for this service, and shall be entitled within the budget appropriation to the necessary expenses, including traveling expenses, incurred in the discharge of his duties.

History.

1951, c. 1095, s. 6; 1967, c. 932, s. 4; 1971, c. 362, s. 8; 1973, c. 426, s. 75.

§ 160A-510.
Organization of commission.

The members of a commission shall select from among themselves a chairman, a vice-chairman, and such other officers as the commission may determine. A commission may employ a secretary, its own counsel, and such technical experts, and such other agents and employees, permanent or temporary, as it may require, and may determine the qualifications and fix the compensation of such persons. A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum for its meeting. Members shall not be liable personally on the bonds or other obligations of the commission, and the rights of creditors shall be solely against such commission. A commission may delegate to one or more of its members, agents or employees such of its powers as it shall deem necessary to carry out the purposes of this Article, subject always to the supervision and control of the commission. For inefficiency or neglect of duty or misconduct in office, a commissioner of a commission may be removed by the governing body, but a commissioner shall be removed only after a hearing and after he shall have been given a copy of the charges at least 10 days prior to such hearing and have had an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel.

History.

1951, c. 1095, s. 7; 1971, c. 362, s. 9; 1973, c. 426, s. 75.

§ 160A-511.
Interest of members or employees.

No member or employee of a commission shall acquire any interest, direct or indirect, in any redevelopment project or in any property included or planned to be included in any redevelopment area, or in any area which he may have reason to believe may be certified to be a redevelopment area, nor shall he have any interest, direct or indirect, in any contract or proposed contract for materials or services to be furnished or used by a commission, or in any contract with a redeveloper or prospective redeveloper relating, directly or indirectly, to any redevelopment project, except that a member or employee of a commission may acquire property in a residential redevelopment area from a person or entity other than the commission after the residential redevelopment plan for that area is adopted if:

The primary purpose of acquisition is to occupy the property as his principal residence;

The redevelopment plan does not provide for acquisition of such property by the commission; and

Prior to acquiring title to the property, the member or employee shall have disclosed in writing to the commission and to the local governing body his intent to acquire the property and to occupy the property as his principal residence.

Except as authorized herein, the acquisition of any such interest in a redevelopment project or in any such property or contract shall constitute misconduct in office. If any member or employee of a commission shall have already owned or controlled within the preceding two years any interest, direct or indirect, in any property later included or planned to be included in any redevelopment project, under the jurisdiction of the commission, or has any such interest in any contract for material or services to be furnished or used in connection with any redevelopment project, he shall disclose the same in writing to the commission and to the local governing body. Any disclosure required herein shall be entered in writing upon the minute books of the commission. Failure to make disclosure shall constitute misconduct in office.

History.

1951, c. 1095, s. 8; 1973, c. 426, s. 75; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1139.

Local Modification.

City of Charlotte: 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 964.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

As to applicability to member’s lease of building in redevelopment project,

see opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Miles B. Fowler, 42 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 197 (1973).